Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB464.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9702 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9702. Definitions.[As used in this chapter "court" and "judge" include (when exercising criminal or quasi-criminal jurisdiction pursuant to section 1515 (relating to jurisdiction and venue)) a magisterial district judge.] The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: "College." Any of the following:(1) An institution created prior to, on or after the effective date of this paragraph under any of the following:(i) Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 12345678910111213141516171819 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.(ii) The act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1132, No.484), known as the Community College Act of 1963.(2) An independent institution of higher education that is located in this Commonwealth and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth, entitled to:(i) confer degrees under 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees); and(ii) apply to itself the designation "college," "university" or "seminary" as provided for by standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).(3) A State-owned institution.(4) A State-related institution.(5) An education enterprise."Court" or "judge." The term shall include, when exercising criminal or quasi-criminal jurisdiction under section 1515 (relating to jurisdiction and venue), a magisterial district judge."Elementary or secondary school." In the buildings of, on the grounds of or in a conveyance providing transportation to or from any of the following:(1) An elementary or secondary publicly funded educational institution.(2) An elementary or secondary private school licensed by the Department of Education.(3) An elementary or secondary parochial school."Government office." The place of business of any of the following:20250SB0464PN0416 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Governor and the departments, boards, commissions, authorities and officers and agencies of the Commonwealth or other instrumentalities of the Commonwealth.(2) The General Assembly and its officers and agencies.(3) A political subdivision, municipality or other local authority and the departments, boards, commissions, authorities and officers and agencies of the political subdivision or other instrumentality of the political subdivision.(4) A court or other officer or agency of the unified judicial system or instrumentality of the court or unified judicial system."Place of worship." In the buildings of or on the grounds of a church, synagogue, mosque or other regularly established place of meeting of a religious institution or religious organization."Professional sports facility." A stadium, arena or other place owned or leased by a professional sports organization at which a professional athletic event is conducted in the presence of individuals who pay admission to view the event.Section 2. Section 9711(d) of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.* * *(d) Aggravating circumstances.--Aggravating circumstances shall be limited to the following:* * *(19) The defendant committed the killing on the premises of an elementary or secondary school, college, place of worship, professional sports facility or government office.* * *20250SB0464PN0416 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0464PN0416 - 4 - 1